Illinois, session 104th, SB2681.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 8-406 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/8-406)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 8-406)7    Sec. 8-406. Certificate of public convenience and 8necessity. 9    (a) No public utility not owning any city or village 10franchise nor engaged in performing any public service or in 11furnishing any product or commodity within this State as of 12July 1, 1921 and not possessing a certificate of public 13convenience and necessity from the Illinois Commerce 14Commission, the State Public Utilities Commission, or the 15Public Utilities Commission, at the time Public Act 84-617 16goes into effect (January 1, 1986), shall transact any 17business in this State until it shall have obtained a 18certificate from the Commission that public convenience and 19necessity require the transaction of such business. A 20certificate of public convenience and necessity requiring the 21transaction of public utility business in any area of this 22State shall include authorization to the public utility 23receiving the certificate of public convenience and necessity   SB2681- 2 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1to construct such plant, equipment, property, or facility as 2is provided for under the terms and conditions of its tariff 3and as is necessary to provide utility service and carry out 4the transaction of public utility business by the public 5utility in the designated area.6    (b) No public utility shall begin the construction of any 7new plant, equipment, property, or facility which is not in 8substitution of any existing plant, equipment, property, or 9facility, or any extension or alteration thereof or in 10addition thereto, unless and until it shall have obtained from 11the Commission a certificate that public convenience and 12necessity require such construction. Whenever after a hearing 13the Commission determines that any new construction or the 14transaction of any business by a public utility will promote 15the public convenience and is necessary thereto, it shall have 16the power to issue certificates of public convenience and 17necessity. The Commission shall determine that proposed 18construction will promote the public convenience and necessity 19only if the utility demonstrates: (1) that the proposed 20construction is necessary to provide adequate, reliable, and 21efficient service to its customers and is the least-cost means 22of satisfying the service needs of its customers or that the 23proposed construction will promote the development of an 24effectively competitive electricity market that operates 25efficiently, is equitable to all customers, and is the least 26cost means of satisfying those objectives; (2) that the   SB2681- 3 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1utility is capable of efficiently managing and supervising the 2construction process and has taken sufficient action to ensure 3adequate and efficient construction and supervision thereof; 4and (3) that the utility is capable of financing the proposed 5construction without significant adverse financial 6consequences for the utility or its customers.7    (b-5) As used in this subsection (b-5):8    "Qualifying direct current applicant" means an entity that 9seeks to provide direct current bulk transmission service for 10the purpose of transporting electric energy in interstate 11commerce.12    "Qualifying direct current project" means a high voltage 13direct current electric service line that crosses at least one 14Illinois border, the Illinois portion of which is physically 15located within the region of the Midcontinent Independent 16System Operator, Inc., or its successor organization, and runs 17through the counties of Pike, Scott, Greene, Macoupin, 18Montgomery, Christian, Shelby, Cumberland, and Clark, is 19capable of transmitting electricity at voltages of 345 20kilovolts or above, and may also include associated 21interconnected alternating current interconnection facilities 22in this State that are part of the proposed project and 23reasonably necessary to connect the project with other 24portions of the grid.25    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, a 26qualifying direct current applicant that does not own,   SB2681- 4 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1control, operate, or manage, within this State, any plant, 2equipment, or property used or to be used for the transmission 3of electricity at the time of its application or of the 4Commission's order may file an application on or before 5December 31, 2023 with the Commission pursuant to this Section 6or Section 8-406.1 for, and the Commission may grant, a 7certificate of public convenience and necessity to construct, 8operate, and maintain a qualifying direct current project. The 9qualifying direct current applicant may also include in the 10application requests for authority under Section 8-503. The 11Commission shall grant the application for a certificate of 12public convenience and necessity and requests for authority 13under Section 8-503 if it finds that the qualifying direct 14current applicant and the proposed qualifying direct current 15project satisfy the requirements of this subsection and 16otherwise satisfy the criteria of this Section or Section 178-406.1 and the criteria of Section 8-503, as applicable to 18the application and to the extent such criteria are not 19superseded by the provisions of this subsection. The 20Commission's order on the application for the certificate of 21public convenience and necessity shall also include the 22Commission's findings and determinations on the request or 23requests for authority pursuant to Section 8-503. Prior to 24filing its application under either this Section or Section 258-406.1, the qualifying direct current applicant shall conduct 263 public meetings in accordance with subsection (h) of this   SB2681- 5 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1Section. If the qualifying direct current applicant 2demonstrates in its application that the proposed qualifying 3direct current project is designed to deliver electricity to a 4point or points on the electric transmission grid in either or 5both the PJM Interconnection, LLC or the Midcontinent 6Independent System Operator, Inc., or their respective 7successor organizations, the proposed qualifying direct 8current project shall be deemed to be, and the Commission 9shall find it to be, for public use. If the qualifying direct 10current applicant further demonstrates in its application that 11the proposed transmission project has a capacity of 1,000 12megawatts or larger and a voltage level of 345 kilovolts or 13greater, the proposed transmission project shall be deemed to 14satisfy, and the Commission shall find that it satisfies, the 15criteria stated in item (1) of subsection (b) of this Section 16or in paragraph (1) of subsection (f) of Section 8-406.1, as 17applicable to the application, without the taking of 18additional evidence on these criteria. Prior to the transfer 19of functional control of any transmission assets to a regional 20transmission organization, a qualifying direct current 21applicant shall request Commission approval to join a regional 22transmission organization in an application filed pursuant to 23this subsection (b-5) or separately pursuant to Section 7-102 24of this Act. The Commission may grant permission to a 25qualifying direct current applicant to join a regional 26transmission organization if it finds that the membership, and   SB2681- 6 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1associated transfer of functional control of transmission 2assets, benefits Illinois customers in light of the attendant 3costs and is otherwise in the public interest. Nothing in this 4subsection (b-5) requires a qualifying direct current 5applicant to join a regional transmission organization. 6Nothing in this subsection (b-5) requires the owner or 7operator of a high voltage direct current transmission line 8that is not a qualifying direct current project to obtain a 9certificate of public convenience and necessity to the extent 10it is not otherwise required by this Section 8-406 or any other 11provision of this Act. 12    (c) As used in this subsection (c):13    "Decommissioning" has the meaning given to that term in 14subsection (a) of Section 8-508.1.15    "Nuclear power reactor" has the meaning given to that term 16in Section 8 of the Nuclear Safety Law of 2004. 17    After the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 18103rd General Assembly, no construction shall commence on any 19new nuclear power reactor with a nameplate capacity of more 20than 300 megawatts of electricity to be located within this 21State, and no certificate of public convenience and necessity 22or other authorization shall be issued therefor by the 23Commission, until the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 24Office of Homeland Security, in consultation with the Illinois 25Environmental Protection Agency and the Illinois Department of 26Natural Resources, finds that the United States Government,   SB2681- 7 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1through its authorized agency, has identified and approved a 2demonstrable technology or means for the disposal of high 3level nuclear waste, or until such construction has been 4specifically approved by a statute enacted by the General 5Assembly. Beginning January 1, 2026, construction may commence 6on a new nuclear power reactor with a nameplate capacity of 300 7megawatts of electricity or less within this State if the 8entity constructing the new nuclear power reactor has obtained 9all permits, licenses, permissions, or approvals governing the 10construction, operation, and funding of decommissioning of 11such nuclear power reactors required by: (1) this Act; (2) any 12rules adopted by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 13Office of Homeland Security under the authority of this Act; 14(3) any applicable federal statutes, including, but not 15limited to, the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, the Energy 16Reorganization Act of 1974, the Low-Level Radioactive Waste 17Policy Amendments Act of 1985, and the Energy Policy Act of 181992; (4) any regulations promulgated or enforced by the U.S. 19Nuclear Regulatory Commission, including, but not limited to, 20those codified at Title X, Parts 20, 30, 40, 50, 70, and 72 of 21the Code of Federal Regulations, as from time to time amended; 22and (5) any other federal or State statute, rule, or 23regulation governing the permitting, licensing, operation, or 24decommissioning of such nuclear power reactors. None of the 25rules developed by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 26and Office of Homeland Security or any other State agency,   SB2681- 8 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1board, or commission pursuant to this Act shall be construed 2to supersede the authority of the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 3Commission. The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 4103rd General Assembly shall not apply to the uprate, renewal, 5or subsequent renewal of any license for an existing nuclear 6power reactor that began operation prior to the effective date 7of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 8    None of the changes made in this amendatory Act of the 9103rd General Assembly are intended to authorize the 10construction of nuclear power plants powered by nuclear power 11reactors that are not either: (1) small modular nuclear 12reactors; or (2) nuclear power reactors licensed by the U.S. 13Nuclear Regulatory Commission to operate in this State prior 14to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd 15General Assembly. 16    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 17applicable State agencies shall take final action on an 18application for a new small modular nuclear reactor within 150 19days after the application is determined or considered to be 20complete. An applicable State agency may extend the final 21action time period for no more than an additional 150 days for 22good cause. If an applicable State agency fails to take final 23action on an application within the initial 150-day time 24period and the time period is not extended, the application 25shall be considered approved by the State agency. If the time 26period is extended and an applicable State agency fails to   SB2681- 9 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1take final action on an application within the extended time 2period, the application shall be considered approved by the 3State agency.4    None of the changes made in this amendatory Act of the 5104th General Assembly are intended to supersede the authority 6of the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission. The changes made in 7this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall not 8apply to the uprate, renewal, or subsequent renewal of any 9license for an existing nuclear power reactor that began 10operation prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act 11of the 104th General Assembly. 12    (d) In making its determination under subsection (b) of 13this Section, the Commission shall attach primary weight to 14the cost or cost savings to the customers of the utility. The 15Commission may consider any or all factors which will or may 16affect such cost or cost savings, including the public 17utility's engineering judgment regarding the materials used 18for construction.19    (e) The Commission may issue a temporary certificate which 20shall remain in force not to exceed one year in cases of 21emergency, to assure maintenance of adequate service or to 22serve particular customers, without notice or hearing, pending 23the determination of an application for a certificate, and may 24by regulation exempt from the requirements of this Section 25temporary acts or operations for which the issuance of a 26certificate will not be required in the public interest.  SB2681- 10 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1    A public utility shall not be required to obtain but may 2apply for and obtain a certificate of public convenience and 3necessity pursuant to this Section with respect to any matter 4as to which it has received the authorization or order of the 5Commission under the Electric Supplier Act, and any such 6authorization or order granted a public utility by the 7Commission under that Act shall as between public utilities be 8deemed to be, and shall have except as provided in that Act the 9same force and effect as, a certificate of public convenience 10and necessity issued pursuant to this Section.11    No electric cooperative shall be made or shall become a 12party to or shall be entitled to be heard or to otherwise 13appear or participate in any proceeding initiated under this 14Section for authorization of power plant construction and as 15to matters as to which a remedy is available under the Electric 16Supplier Act.17    (f) Such certificates may be altered or modified by the 18Commission, upon its own motion or upon application by the 19person or corporation affected. Unless exercised within a 20period of 2 years from the grant thereof, authority conferred 21by a certificate of convenience and necessity issued by the 22Commission shall be null and void.23    No certificate of public convenience and necessity shall 24be construed as granting a monopoly or an exclusive privilege, 25immunity or franchise.26    (g) A public utility that undertakes any of the actions   SB2681- 11 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1described in items (1) through (3) of this subsection (g) or 2that has obtained approval pursuant to Section 8-406.1 of this 3Act shall not be required to comply with the requirements of 4this Section to the extent such requirements otherwise would 5apply. For purposes of this Section and Section 8-406.1 of 6this Act, "high voltage electric service line" means an 7electric line having a design voltage of 100,000 or more. For 8purposes of this subsection (g), a public utility may do any of 9the following:10        (1) replace or upgrade any existing high voltage 11    electric service line and related facilities, 12    notwithstanding its length;13        (2) relocate any existing high voltage electric 14    service line and related facilities, notwithstanding its 15    length, to accommodate construction or expansion of a 16    roadway or other transportation infrastructure; or17        (3) construct a high voltage electric service line and 18    related facilities that is constructed solely to serve a 19    single customer's premises or to provide a generator 20    interconnection to the public utility's transmission 21    system and that will pass under or over the premises owned 22    by the customer or generator to be served or under or over 23    premises for which the customer or generator has secured 24    the necessary right of way. 25    (h) A public utility seeking to construct a high-voltage 26electric service line and related facilities (Project) must   SB2681- 12 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1show that the utility has held a minimum of 2 pre-filing public 2meetings to receive public comment concerning the Project in 3each county where the Project is to be located, no earlier than 46 months prior to filing an application for a certificate of 5public convenience and necessity from the Commission. Notice 6of the public meeting shall be published in a newspaper of 7general circulation within the affected county once a week for 83 consecutive weeks, beginning no earlier than one month prior 9to the first public meeting. If the Project traverses 2 10contiguous counties and where in one county the transmission 11line mileage and number of landowners over whose property the 12proposed route traverses is one-fifth or less of the 13transmission line mileage and number of such landowners of the 14other county, then the utility may combine the 2 pre-filing 15meetings in the county with the greater transmission line 16mileage and affected landowners. All other requirements 17regarding pre-filing meetings shall apply in both counties. 18Notice of the public meeting, including a description of the 19Project, must be provided in writing to the clerk of each 20county where the Project is to be located. A representative of 21the Commission shall be invited to each pre-filing public 22meeting.23    (h-5) A public utility seeking to construct a high-voltage 24electric service line and related facilities must also show 25that the Project has complied with training and competence 26requirements under subsection (b) of Section 15 of the   SB2681- 13 -LRB104 14477 AAS 27616 b1Electric Transmission Systems Construction Standards Act. 2    (i) For applications filed after August 18, 2015 (the 3effective date of Public Act 99-399), the Commission shall, by 4certified mail, notify each owner of record of land, as 5identified in the records of the relevant county tax assessor, 6included in the right-of-way over which the utility seeks in 7its application to construct a high-voltage electric line of 8the time and place scheduled for the initial hearing on the 9public utility's application. The utility shall reimburse the 10Commission for the cost of the postage and supplies incurred 11for mailing the notice.12(Source: P.A. 102-609, eff. 8-27-21; 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 13102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-931, eff. 5-27-22; 103-569, eff. 146-1-24; 103-1066, eff. 2-20-25.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.